Utah statutes.
31A-27-503.   Commissioner's administrative actions.
(1) (a)  The commissioner may take an action described in Subsection (1)(b)
whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe, and determines
after a hearing that an insurer:
(i)  has committed or engaged in an act, practice, or transaction that would
subject the insurer to a formal delinquency proceeding under Chapter 27a,
Insurer Receivership Act;
(ii)  is committing or engaging in an act, practice, or transaction that would
subject the insurer to a formal delinquency proceeding under Chapter 27a,
Insurer Receivership Act;
(iii)  is about to commit or engage in an act, practice, or transaction that
would subject the insurer to a formal delinquency proceeding under Chapter
27a, Insurer Receivership Act; or
(iv)  is in or is about to be in a condition that would subject the insurer to
a formal delinquency proceeding under Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act.
(b)  If the conditions of Subsection (1)(a) are met, the commissioner may make
and serve upon the insurer and any other persons whose action or forbearance
from action is reasonably necessary, those orders, other than a seizure order
under Section 31A-27a-201, that are reasonably necessary to correct,
eliminate, or remedy the act, practice, transaction, or condition described in
Subsection (1)(a).
(c)  The commissioner may issue an order for the insurer to submit to
supervision by a supervisor appointed by the commissioner until the act,
practice, transaction, or condition that is the ground for the order has been
halted or corrected.
(2) (a)  The commissioner may make and serve an order issued under Subsection
(1) without notice and before a hearing if:
(i)  the conditions of Subsection (1) are satisfied; and
(ii)  it appears to the commissioner that irreparable harm to the property or
business of the insurer or to the interests of its policyholders, creditors,
or the public may occur unless the commissioner issues, with immediate effect,
the order.
(b)  The commissioner shall serve the insurer with an order described in this
Subsection (2) and a notice of agency action, containing a statement of the
reasons why irreparable harm is threatened unless the order is issued with
immediate effect.
(3) (a)  If the commissioner issues an order for supervision of an insurer
under Subsection (1) or (2), the commissioner shall:
(i)  notify the insurer that the insurer is under the supervision of the
commissioner; and
(ii)  explain the reasons for that supervision.
(b)  During the period of supervision, the commissioner may prohibit the
insurer from doing any of the following, without the prior approval of the
commissioner or a supervisor appointed by the commissioner:
(i)  transferring any of its assets or its business in force;
(ii)  withdrawing funds from any of its bank accounts;
(iii)  lending any of its funds;
(iv)  investing any of its funds;
(v)  transferring any of its property;
(vi)  incurring any debt, obligation, or liability other than in the ordinary
and usual course of business; or
(vii)  entering into any new reinsurance contract or treaty.
(4) (a)  If the commissioner issues a summary order before a hearing under
Subsection (2), the insurer may waive the commissioner's hearing and apply for
immediate judicial relief by any remedy afforded by law, without first
exhausting the insurer's administrative remedies.
(b)  If the insurer has a hearing before the commissioner, the insurer and any
person whose interests are substantially affected are entitled to judicial
review of any order issued by the commissioner.
